Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB644.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "booth space" in section 1 of the act of May 3, 1933 (P.L.242, No.86), referred to as the Cosmetology Law, is amended to read:Section 1. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *["Booth space" means the area of a salon in which a licensed 12345678910111213141516171819202122 cosmetologist or a holder of a limited license provides to a client a service for which a license is required under this act.]* * *Section 2. Section 8.1 of the act, amended October 16, 2024 (P.L.983, No.100), is repealed:[Section 8.1. Booth Rental Prohibited.--The rental of booth space by an owner of a cosmetology salon, or the owner of a salon limited to esthetics or nail technology to any holder of a license issued under this act is unlawful.]Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0644PN0653 - 2 - 1234567891011